apertium-id-ms.ms.dix
    <pardef n="pedalaman__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe-an"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pedalamannya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe-an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pegiat-pegiat__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pegiat-pegiatnya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pegiat__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pegiatnya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="pe"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pemerataan-pemerataan__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="per"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pemerataan-pemerataannya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="per"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pemerataan__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="per"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pemerataannya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="per"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pembetulan-pembetulan__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pembetulan-pembetulannya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pembetulan__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pembetulannya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN-an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pembohong-pembohong__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pembohong-pembohongnya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pembohong__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pembohongnya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="peN"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="perkhidmatan-perkhidmatan__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per-an"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="perkhidmatan-perkhidmatannya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per-an"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="perkhidmatan__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per-an"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="perkhidmatannya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per-an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="perusak-perusak__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="perusak-perusaknya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="perusak__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="perusaknya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="per"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="besaran-besaran__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="san"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="besaran__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="subst"/><s n="san"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="terbaik__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="ter"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ingin__adv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adv"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengemudiankan__adv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adv"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengemudiankannya__adv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adv"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="berlangsung__adv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adv"/><s n="actio"/><s n="ber"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dikemudiankan__adv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adv"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dikemudiankannya__adv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adv"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengapa__adv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keesokan-keesokan__adv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adv"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keesokan-keesokannya__adv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adv"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="red"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keesokan__adv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adv"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keesokannya__adv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adv"/><s n="subst"/><s n="ke-an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="namun__cnjadv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="cnjadv"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dan__cnjcoo">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="jika__cnjsub">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ini__det">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sebuah__det">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="aduh__ij">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="ij"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="hore"><i>hore</i><par n="aduh__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="wahai"><i>wahai</i><par n="aduh__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="langsung"><p><l>berlangsung</l><r>langsung</r></p><par n="berlangsung__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="sahaja"><p><l>bersahaja</l><r>sahaja</r></p><par n="berlangsung__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="luas"><p><l>luasan</l><r>luas</r></p><par n="besaran__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tawar"><p><l>tawaran</l><r>tawar</r></p><par n="besaran__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lalu"><i>lalu</i><par n="dan__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="sementara"><i>sementara</i><par n="dan__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="pertama-tama"><i>pertama-tama</i><par n="ingin__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="terlampau"><i>terlampau</i><par n="ingin__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ini"><i>ini</i><par n="ini__det"/></e>
    <e lm="itu"><i>itu</i><par n="ini__det"/></e>
    <e lm="kalau"><i>kalau</i><par n="jika__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="seakan-akan"><i>seakan-akan</i><par n="jika__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="ingin"><p><l>keinginan</l><r>ingin</r></p><par n="keesokan__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="mungkin"><p><l>kemungkinan</l><r>mungkin</r></p><par n="keesokan__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ingin"><p><l>keinginannya</l><r>ingin</r></p><par n="keesokannya__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="kurang"><p><l>kekurangannya</l><r>kurang</r></p><par n="keesokannya__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dari manakah"><i>dari<b/>manakah</i><par n="mengapa__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="kenapakah"><i>kenapakah</i><par n="mengapa__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="kurang"><p><l>mengurangkan</l><r>kurang</r></p><par n="mengemudiankan__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tunai"><p><l>menunaikan</l><r>tunai</r></p><par n="mengemudiankan__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dapat"><p><l>mendapatkannya</l><r>dapat</r></p><par n="mengemudiankannya__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ingin"><p><l>menginginkannya</l><r>ingin</r></p><par n="mengemudiankannya__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="maka itu"><i>maka<b/>itu</i><par n="namun__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="sebab itu"><i>sebab<b/>itu</i><par n="namun__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="lacur"><p><l>pelacuran</l><r>lacur</r></p><par n="pedalaman__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lebar"><p><l>pelebaran</l><r>lebar</r></p><par n="pedalaman__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="mulia"><p><l>pemuliaan</l><r>mulia</r></p><par n="pedalaman__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="muda"><p><l>pemuda-pemuda</l><r>muda</r></p><par n="pegiat-pegiat__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lawak"><p><l>pelawak</l><r>lawak</r></p><par n="pegiat__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="malu"><p><l>pemalu</l><r>malu</r></p><par n="pegiat__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tinggi"><p><l>petinggi</l><r>tinggi</r></p><par n="pegiat__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dekat"><p><l>pendekatan</l><r>dekat</r></p><par n="pembetulan__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="pisah"><p><l>pemisahan</l><r>pisah</r></p><par n="pembetulan__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="terang"><p><l>penerangan</l><r>terang</r></p><par n="pembetulan__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="jelas"><p><l>penjelasannya</l><r>jelas</r></p><par n="pembetulannya__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="besar"><p><l>pembesar-pembesar</l><r>besar</r></p><par n="pembohong-pembohong__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dingin"><p><l>pendingin</l><r>dingin</r></p><par n="pembohong__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kuat"><p><l>penguat</l><r>kuat</r></p><par n="pembohong__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rata"><p><l>pemerataan</l><r>rata</r></p><par n="pemerataan__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="raya"><p><l>perayaan-perayaan</l><r>raya</r></p><par n="perkhidmatan-perkhidmatan__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cinta"><p><l>percintaan</l><r>cinta</r></p><par n="perkhidmatan__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="nyata"><p><l>pernyataan</l><r>nyata</r></p><par n="perkhidmatan__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tahan"><p><l>pertahanannya</l><r>tahan</r></p><par n="perkhidmatannya__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rajin"><p><l>perajin</l><r>rajin</r></p><par n="perusak__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rusuh"><p><l>perusuh</l><r>rusuh</r></p><par n="perusak__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="seekor"><i>seekor</i><par n="sebuah__det"/></e>
    <e lm="seorang"><i>seorang</i><par n="sebuah__det"/></e>
    <e lm="lepas"><p><l>terlepas</l><r>lepas</r></p><par n="terbaik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="utama"><p><l>terutama</l><r>utama</r></p><par n="terbaik__adj"/></e>
